Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.07
Health planning region, defined.

Health planning region means one of the twenty-six health planning regions established in the Nebraska State Health Plan, 1986-1991.

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 11.